Maryland, session 2026, SB0345.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
15–201.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(A–1) “DEALER ASSOCIATION” MEANS A BUSINESS ENTITY THAT:
(1) IS PRIMARILY OWNED BY OR COMPOSED OF DEALERS THAT
COLLECTIVELY REPRESENT A MAJORITY OF THE FRANCHISED DEALERS IN THE
STATE; AND
(2) PRIMARILY REPRESENTS THE INTERESTS OF DEALERS.
(F) “MANUFACTURER ASSOCIATION” MEANS A BUSINESS ENTITY THAT:
(1) IS PRIMARILY OWNED BY OR COMPOSED OF MANUFACTURERS
THAT COLLECTIVELY REPRESENT A MAJORITY OF THE MANUFACTURERS IN THE
STATE; AND
(2) PRIMARILY REPRESENTS THE INTERESTS OF MANUFACTURERS.
[(f)] (G) “Second–stage manufacturer” has the meaning stated in § 13–113.2 of
this article.
15–214.
(A) [In] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION
(B) OF THIS SECTION AND EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS
SECTION, IN addition to any other right to request a hearing under this subtitle and
notwithstanding any provisions of the franchise agreement to the contrary, a dealer,

SENATE BILL 345 3
designated dealer successor as provided in § 15–211.1 of this subtitle, DEALER
ASSOCIATION ON BEHALF OF ITSELF, A DEALER, OR A GROUP OF DEALERS,
manufacturer, MANUFACTURER ASSOCIATION ON BEHALF OF ITSELF, A
MANUFACTURER, OR A GROUP OF MANUFACTURERS, distributor, or factory branch may
request a hearing under Title 12, Subtitle 2 of this article to:
(1) Resolve a dispute under any provision of this title between a dealer [or],
a designated dealer successor, OR A DEALER ASSOCIATION and a manufacturer,
MANUFACTURER ASSOCIATION, distributor, or factory branch; or
(2) Seek clarification or interpretation of any provision of this [subtitle]
TITLE.
(B) A DEALER ASSOCIATION MAY REQUEST A HEARING UNDER SUBSECTION
(A)(1) OF THIS SECTION ONLY IF:
(1) AT LEAST ONE MEMBER OF THE DEALER ASSOCIATION HAS A
DISPUTE UNDER ANY PROVISION OF THIS TITLE WITH A MANUFACTURER,
DISTRIBUTOR, OR FACTORY BRANCH;
(2) THE INTERESTS THAT THE DEALER ASSOCIATION SEEKS TO
PROTECT ARE GERMANE TO THE PURPOSE OF THE DEALER ASSOCIATION; AND
(3) THE CLAIM ASSERTED AND THE RELIEF REQUESTED DO NOT
REQUIRE THE PARTICIPATION OF EACH OF THE INDIVIDUAL MEMBERS.
(C) SUBSECTION (A)(1) OF THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A DISPUTE
INVOLVING A MANUFACTURER, DISTRIBUTOR, OR FACTORY BRANCH THAT DOES
NOT HAVE AT LEAST ONE FRANCHISED DEALER IN THIS STATE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.